Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 458.650 is amended to read:
458.650. (1) The Housing and Community  Services Department shall administer the Emergency
Housing Account to assist homeless  individuals and individuals who are at risk of becoming
homeless, through  means including the emergency housing assistance program and the state
homeless assistance program.  Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a) of this section, the state homeless
assistance program shall serve individuals experiencing homelessness, especially  unsheltered
homelessness, without respect to income.
(2) The  Oregon Housing Stability Council shall develop a policy for the use of program funds
with the advice of:
(a) Persons who have experienced housing instability;
(b) Tribes;
(c) The Community Action Partnership of Oregon;
(d) Continuums of care, as defined in 24 C.F.R. part 578;
(e) Local governments;
(f) Nonprofit organizations;
(g) Homeless services providers;
(h) Culturally specific organizations;
(i) Housing providers;
(j) Veterans’ services organizations; and
(k) Other entities identified by the department by rule.
(3) The policy under subsection (2) of this section  shall direct that program funds shall be used:
(a) To provide to low  and very low income individuals, including but not limited to individuals
more than 65 years of age, persons with disabilities, agricultural workers and Native Americans:
(A) Emergency shelters and attendant services;
(B) Transitional housing  services designed to assist individuals to make the transition from
homelessness to permanent housing and economic independence;
(C) Supportive housing services to enable individuals to continue living in their own homes  or
to provide  in-home services for such individuals for whom suitable programs do not exist in their
geographic area;
(D) Programs that provide emergency payment of home payments, rents or utilities;
Enrolled House Bill 3970 (HB 3970-A) Page 1
(E) Support for individuals with companion animals, as defined in ORS 401.977, that includes:
(i) Food for both companion animals and their owners;
(ii) Crates or kennels on-site or  off-site that are easily accessible to the companion animal
owners;
(iii) Basic veterinary services, including behavioral services; and
(iv) Rules of conduct and responsibility regarding companion animals and their owners; or
(F) Some or all of the services or assistance described in subparagraphs (A) to (E) of this para-
graph.
(b) To provide the services and  assistance described in paragraph (a) of this subsection to
[school-aged children enrolled in  kindergarten through grade 12 ] the following individuals , or to
their families, [ who] if the individuals  are homeless or at risk of becoming homeless[ .]:
(A) Individuals who are school-aged children  enrolled in or of an age to be eligible to be
enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12;
(B) Individuals who are pregnant; or
(C) Individuals between birth and an age eligible to be enrolled in kindergarten.
(c) To align with  federal strategies and resources that are available to prevent and end
homelessness, including the  requirement of providing culturally responsive services and using
evidence-based and emerging practices effective in ending homelessness,  including practices unique
to rural communities.
(4)(a) The council shall require  as a condition of awarding a grant that the organization dem-
onstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the organization:
(A) Has the capacity to deliver any service proposed by the organization;
(B) Is a culturally responsive organization or is engaged in a process to  become a culturally
responsive organization;
(C) Engages with culturally specific organizations; and
(D) Supports local homelessness system planning efforts.
(b) Any funds granted under this section may not be used to replace existing funds. Funds
granted under this section may be used to supplement  existing funds. An organization may use funds
to support existing programs or to establish new programs.
(5) The department may expend funds from the account for:
(a) The administration of the  account as provided for in the legislatively approved budget, as
that term is defined in ORS 291.002,  for the department in support of directing a statewide policy
on homelessness that ensures use of evidence-based and  emerging practices, service equity in fund-
ing and local planning processes.
(b) The development of technical assistance and training resources  for organizations developing
and operating  emergency shelters as defined in ORS 197.782 and transitional housing accommo-
dations as described in ORS 197.746.
(6) The department  shall utilize outcome-oriented contracting processes and evidence-based and
emerging practices for account program funds, including evidence-based and  emerging practices for
serving rural communities.
(7) Twenty-five percent of moneys deposited in the account pursuant to ORS  294.187 are dedi-
cated to the emergency housing assistance program for assistance to veterans who are homeless  or
at risk of becoming homeless.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 3970 (HB 3970-A) Page 2
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3970 (HB 3970-A) Page 3